Utah statutes.
34-40-203.   Investigation authority.

(1)  The division shall have access to all payroll records of any place of business or establishment, required by this chapter to pay its employees a minimum wage, to investigate for compliance with this chapter.

(2)  The division shall have access to business records kept at the place of business or establishment which may aid in the enforcement of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 240, 1996 General Session

